North Carolina statutes. Chapter 155. County Treasurer. [Repealed]
§§ 155-1 through 155-8.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1971, c. 780, s. 34.

§ 155-9.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1953, c. 973, s. 3.

§§ 155-10 through 155-14.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1971, c. 780, s. 34.

§ 155-15.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1953, c. 973, s. 3.

§§ 155-16 through 155-18.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1971, c. 780.